fi: Oboekotelon rakenne: Kova kotelo; Hybridi (kova kuori ja pehmeä ulkopinta); Puolikova kotelo; Pehmeä keikkakassi; Muu
pt-BR: Estojo para oboé design: Estojo rígido; Híbrido (revestimento rígido com exterior macio); Estojo semirrígido; Capa macia (gig bag); Outro
zh-CN: 双簧管盒设计: 硬盒; 混合型（硬壳软面）; 半硬盒; 软质演出包; 其他
th: การออกแบบเคสสำหรับโอโบ: เคสแข็ง; ไฮบริด (โครงแข็งหุ้มด้วยวัสดุนุ่ม); เคสกึ่งแข็ง; กระเป๋าผ้า; อื่นๆ
hu: Oboatok kialakítása: Keménytok; Hibrid (kemény tok, puha külső); Félmerev tok; Puhatok (gig bag); Egyéb
vi: Thiết kế hộp đựng kèn oboe: Hộp cứng; Lai (vỏ cứng bọc mềm bên ngoài); Hộp bán cứng; Túi mềm; Khác
pt-PT: Oboé caixa interior design: Estojo rígido; Híbrido (revestimento rígido com exterior suave); Estojo semirrígido; Estojo flexível; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn hoboja: Tvrdé puzdro; Hybridné (tvrdá škrupina s mäkkým zovňajškom); Polotuhé puzdro; Mäkké prenosné puzdro; Iné
hr-HR: Dizajn kutije za obou: Tvrdi kovčeg; Hibridni (tvrdo kućište s mekom vanjštinom); Polutvrdi kovčeg; Mekana torba; Ostalo
ro-RO: Designul cutiei pentru oboi: Carcasă rigidă; Hibrid (carcasă rigidă cu exterior moale); Carcasă semirigidă; Husă moale; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на калъф за обой: Твърд калъф; Хибриден (твърда обвивка с мека външна част); Полутвърд калъф; Мек калъф; Друго
ja: オーボエケースのデザイン: ハードケース; ハイブリッド (ハードシェル、ソフトな外装); セミリジッドケース; ソフトギグバッグ; その他
nb: Design på oboetui: Hardt etui; Hybrid (hardt skall med mykt ytre); Halvstivt etui; Myk gigbag; Annet
el: Σχεδιασμός θήκης όμποε: Σκληρή θήκη; Υβριδική (σκληρό περίβλημα με μαλακό εξωτερικό); Ημίσκληρη θήκη; Μαλακή θήκη (gig bag); Άλλο
fr: Type d’étui de hautbois: Étui rigide; Hybride (coque rigide avec extérieur souple); Étui semi-rigide; Housse souple; Autre
sv: Design av oboefodral: Hårt fodral; Hybrid (hårt skal med mjuk utsida); Halvhårt fodral; Gigbag; Övrigt
it: Design della custodia per oboe: Custodia rigida; Ibrida (guscio rigido con esterno morbido); Custodia semirigida; Borsa morbida; Altro
da: Design af oboetui: Hardcase; Hybrid (hård kuffert med blødt ydre); Halvhård kasse; Blød gigbag; Andet
cs: Design pouzdra hoboje: Pevné pouzdro; Hybridní (pevná skořepina s měkkým povrchem); Polotuhé pouzdro; Měkký obal (gig bag); Ostatní
lt-LT: Obojaus dėklo dizainas: Kietas dėklas; Hibridinis (kietas korpusas su minkšta išore); Pusiau kietas dėklas; Minkštas krepšys; Kita
zh-TW: 雙簧管琴盒設計: 硬盒; 混合式 (硬殼搭配軟式外層); 半硬盒; 軟式琴袋; 其他
ru: Конструкция футляра для гобоя: Жесткий футляр; Гибридный (жесткий каркас с мягкой отделкой); Полужесткий футляр; Мягкий чехол; Другое
sl-SI: Zasnova kovčka za oboo: Trdi kovček; Hibridni (trda lupina z mehko zunanjostjo); Poltogi kovček; Mehka torba; Drugo
en: Oboe case design: Hard case; Hybrid (hard shell with soft exterior); Semi-rigid case; Soft gig bag; Other
de: Design des Oboenkoffers: Hartschalenkoffer; Hybrid (Hartschale mit weicher Außenseite); Halbstarrer Koffer; Weiche Gigbag; Andere
es: Diseño del estuche para oboe: Estuche rígido; Híbrido (carcasa rígida con exterior suave); Estuche semirrígido; Funda blanda; Otro
pl: Konstrukcja futerału na obój: Futerał twardy; Hybrydowy (twarda skorupa z miękkim materiałem zewnętrznym); Futerał półsztywny; Miękki pokrowiec; Inny
tr: Obua kılıfı tasarımı: Sert kılıf; Hibrit (yumuşak dış yüzeyli sert kabuk); Yarı sert kılıf; Yumuşak taşıma çantası; Diğer
nl: Hobo koffer ontwerp: Harde koffer; Hybride (harde schaal met zachte buitenkant); Semi-harde koffer; Zachte gigbag; Overig
ko: 오보에 케이스 디자인: 하드 케이스; 하이브리드(하드 쉘 및 소프트 외장); 반경성 케이스; 소프트 긱 백; 기타